Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1404
Child support; liability of parents; discharge.

The liability of the parent for support of a child shall be discharged by compliance with the terms of a judicial decree for support or the terms of a judicially approved settlement or by the adoption of the child by some other person or persons.

Laws 1941, c. 81, § 4, p. 323;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 43-704;

R.S.1943, § 13-104;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 13-104;

Laws 2026, LB70, § 12.
July 18, 2026